California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) (1) Except as otherwise required by federal law, disenrollment during the minimum enrollment period shall only be for good cause. 

(2) For purposes of this section, the meaning of “good cause” shall be as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14407.8, and shall include “good cause” as defined by federal laws or regulations governing Medi-Cal managed care contracting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 95, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14408.

(a) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a contractor that has entered into a contract with the department pursuant to this chapter may make the benefits known to potential enrollees by methods approved by the department.

(b) No prepaid health plan, marketing representative, or marketing organization shall engage in marketing activities prior to written submittal to and approval by the department. All marketing activities, procedures, methods, and places in which any activities will be conducted shall be explicitly described in a marketing plan and approved by the department prior to being used by a prepaid health plan, marketing representative, or marketing organization. The marketing plan shall be updated and submitted for renewed approval on an annual basis. The department may approve, disapprove, or withdraw approval of any marketing activity or procedure. The department shall require the discontinuance of any marketing activity or procedure for which the department withdraws approval. The conduct of activities or procedures not included in an approved marketing plan shall constitute a violation of this article and be subject to sanctions in accordance with Section 14409.

The prepaid health plan shall be responsible for all presentations by its marketing representatives and for their ethical and professional conduct. The department may withdraw certification for participation in the program from, and impose marketing sanctions specified in Section 14409, as applicable, on marketing representatives.

(c) The marketing plan shall meet the standards established by the department. The marketing plan shall include, but not be limited to, an explicit description of the specific marketing activities, the method of identifying individual enrollments by marketing representative, and formal measures to monitor performance of marketing representatives and verify both of the following:

(1) The prepaid health plan’s marketing activities and practices do not violate subdivision (a) of Section 14409.

(2) Beneficiaries receive complete and accurate information about the benefits and limitations of receiving health care services through the prepaid plan in a manner that considers the beneficiary’s level of comprehension.

(d) Each time a marketing representative presents information about the benefits of prepaid health plan enrollment to a beneficiary in order to encourage the beneficiary to enroll, the marketing representative shall leave with the beneficiary printed information identifying the marketing representative by name and prepaid health plan represented.

(e) All printed or illustrated material prepared by the prepaid health plan for dissemination to enrollees or to prospective enrollees shall be submitted to the department prior to dissemination. The department shall acknowledge receipt of the printed or illustrated material within five days, and shall approve or disapprove the material for dissemination within 60 days after the date of notification that the material has been received. The department may withdraw approval of the material previously approved and order its dissemination discontinued. If the department notifies the prepaid health plan of its disapproval or withdrawal of approval, the prepaid health plan shall have the right to meet and confer with the director or his or her designee and demonstrate the purpose and reasonable basis for the distribution of the material to enrollees and potential enrollees.

(f) (1) Any form of door-to-door or in-person marketing that coerces or misleads beneficiaries or selectively enrolls beneficiaries on the basis of their health status is unlawful. In addition, on or after July 1, 1996, door-to-door solicitation of Medi-Cal enrollees shall not be permitted.

(2) On or after July 1, 1996, the health care options presentation required by Sections 14016.5 and 14016.6 or the health care options information required by Sections 14087.305 and 14089 shall be fully operational in counties specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program or in counties where prepaid health plans are contracting with the department pursuant to Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, 14087.96, 14089, and 14089.05. In these counties, on or after July 1, 1996, no enrollment of beneficiaries by prepaid health plans shall occur during in-person marketing activities or during health fairs pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (f). Enrollment shall be exclusively performed and transmitted pursuant to the program required by Sections 14016.5, 14016.6, 14087.305, and 14089.

(3) In the event the health care options presentation required by Sections 14016.5 and 14016.6 is not fully operational or the health care options information required by Sections 14087.305 and 14089 is not fully available, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), the department shall perform the enrollment-only functions until the health care options presentation or information is fully operational or available.

(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude a prepaid health plan from responding to inquiries initiated by beneficiaries or potential beneficiaries.

(5) Until July 1, 1996, a prepaid health plan may participate in an organized community or neighborhood health fair in a public place only if two or more prepaid health plans are participating, or if the plan is invited by the sponsor of the fair. If there are not two or more prepaid health plans providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in a prepaid health plan’s service area, this subdivision shall not apply. On or after July 1, 1996, a prepaid health plan may participate in an organized community or neighborhood health fair in a public place for marketing purposes.

(g) Any prepaid health plan, marketing representative, or marketing organization that violates subdivision (f) shall be subject to the sanctions set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14409 and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment in a county jail for six months, or both, for each violation.

(h) The department shall certify each marketing representative prior to participation in the program in accordance with standards established by the department. Continuing certification for participation in the program shall be contingent upon compliance with this article, as well as guidelines and standards adopted by the department, and may be withdrawn upon their violation, as determined by the department. The department may temporarily decertify any marketing representative when that action is necessary to protect the public welfare or the interests of the Medi-Cal program. Temporary decertification shall be effective immediately upon written notice to the marketing representative and the managed care contractor, and shall remain in effect until the department has made a determination on the merits. Temporary decertification shall be canceled unless the department acts to permanently withdraw certification within 60 days.

(i) No prepaid health plan shall employ in any capacity relating to the marketing operations of the plan a marketing representative whose certification has been withdrawn. Marketing representatives shall not be recertified for participation until the cause for withdrawal of certification has been corrected to the satisfaction of the department. Proof of correction shall be the sole responsibility of the marketing representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 389.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14408.5.

A prepaid health plan that contracts with Medi-Cal managed care or contracts with the Healthy Families Program may provide application assistance pursuant to Section 12693.325 of the Insurance Code during the eligibility redetermination process in order to allow persons to retain coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 97.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14409.

(a) No prepaid health plan, marketing representative, or marketing organization shall in any manner misrepresent itself, the plans it represents, or the Medi-Cal program. A violation of this section shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) False or misleading claims that marketing
 representatives are employees or representatives of the state, county, or anyone other than the prepaid health plan or the organization by whom they are reimbursed.

(2) False or misleading claims that the prepaid health plan is recommended or endorsed by any state or county agency, or by any other organization which has not certified its endorsement in writing to the prepaid health plan.

(3) False or misleading claims that the state or county recommends that a Medi-Cal beneficiary enroll in a prepaid health plan.

(4) Claims that a Medi-Cal beneficiary will lose their benefits under the Medi-Cal program or any other
 health or welfare benefits to which they are legally entitled, if they do not enroll in a prepaid health plan.

(b) Violations of this article or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this article shall result in one or more of the following sanctions that are appropriate to the specific violation, considering the nature of the offense and frequency of occurrence within the prepaid health plan:

(1) Revocation of one or more permitted methods of marketing.

(2) Termination of authorization for a plan to provide application assistance.

(3) Refusal of the department to accept new enrollments for a period specified by the department.

(4) Refusal of the department to accept enrollments submitted by a marketing representative or organization.

(5) Forfeiture by the plan of all or part of the capitation payments for persons enrolled as a result of such violations.

(6) Requirement that the prepaid health plan in violation of this article personally contact each enrollee enrolled to explain the nature of the violation and inform the enrollee of
 their right to disenroll.

(7) Application of sanctions as provided in Section 14197.7.

(8) Temporarily suspend capitation payments for beneficiaries enrolled in violation of this article, or regulations adopted thereunder, until the prepaid health plan is in substantial compliance with the statutory and regulatory
 requirements.

(c) Any marketing representative who violates subdivision (a) while engaged in door-to-door solicitation is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment in a county jail for six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 9.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14410.

No prepaid health plan or marketing representative shall adopt or utilize any procedure to identify prospective enrollees with medical or psychiatric problems in order to exclude them from enrollment in the prepaid health plan, other than medical conditions specifically excluded from coverage by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14411.

(a) No prepaid health plan or marketing organization shall solicit prospective enrollees on county premises for benefits or services available pursuant to this chapter except under any one of the following conditions:

(1) Such marketing activities are performed by a county employee under an agreement between the county and the prepaid health plan, and all marketing presentations and materials to be used have been approved by the department.

(2) Such marketing activities are performed by a state employee under an agreement between the department, county, and the prepaid health plan, and all marketing presentations and materials to be used have been approved by the department. 

(3) Such marketing activities are performed by a marketing representative of a prepaid health plan under an agreement between the county, the prepaid health plan and the department, and all marketing presentations and materials to be used have been approved by the department.

(b) No prepaid health plan or marketing organization shall solicit prospective enrollees on state premises for benefits or services available pursuant to this chapter, except under any one of the following conditions:

(1) Such marketing activities are performed by a state employee under an agreement between the department, the Department of General Services, and the prepaid health plan, and all marketing presentations and materials to be used have been approved by the department.

(2) Such marketing activities are performed by a marketing representative of a prepaid health plan under an agreement between the department, the Department of General Services, and the prepaid health plan, and all marketing presentations and materials to be used have been approved by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14412.

(a) The enrollment of a Medi-Cal beneficiary in the prepaid health plan shall not be terminated except for loss of eligibility, for good cause as determined by the department, or at the request of the beneficiary.

(b) Enrollment shall be terminated at the request of the Medi-Cal beneficiary, to the extent required by federal law.

(c) Any Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in a prepaid health plan who would remain eligible for Medi-Cal program benefits for three additional months pursuant to Section 14005.8 shall remain enrolled in the prepaid health plan and shall not receive a Medi-Cal card unless disenrollment is requested by the beneficiary, and the request is submitted in accordance with state and federal law.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall develop such policies and procedures to maximize continuity of care for persons enrolled in prepaid health plans and to insure that the eligibility determination or redetermination process does not unnecessarily interfere with such enrollment or create gaps in the delivery of health services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14413.

(a) Requests for disenrollment shall be made to an authorized representative of the prepaid health plan or to the department. All requests for disenrollment, except those submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14303.1, subdivision (c) of Section 14303.2, or paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 14409, or for other good cause as determined by the director, shall be processed through the prepaid health plan’s grievance procedure as approved by the department. Disenrollment requests received by the prepaid health plan shall be submitted to the department, on standard disenrollment forms prescribed by the department, within a reasonable time following the date of such signed request, as determined by the director, to permit the department to terminate enrollment effective the
 beginning of the first calendar month following a full calendar month after the request is made.

(b) All applications for disenrollment shall be processed by the department, and where Medi-Cal eligibility continues or Medi-Cal coverage is extended under Section 14005.8, a Medi-Cal card shall be issued effective not later than the beginning of the first calendar month following a full calendar month after the request for disenrollment is made. Submittal of a request for disenrollment for processing through the grievance procedure of a prepaid health plan shall not be deemed to infringe on this entitlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 287.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Standards for Prepaid Health Plans [14450. - 14464.]

14450.

(a) No contract between the department and a prepaid health plan shall be approved or renewed unless the providers and the facilities of the prepaid health plan meet the Medi-Cal program standards for participation as established by the director. In addition, a prepaid health plan shall meet the standards required pursuant to the provisions of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), standards specifically required by federal law, and the following requirements:

(1) Each prepaid health plan shall establish a grievance procedure under
 which enrollees may submit their grievances. The procedure shall be approved by the department prior to the approval of the contract. The department shall establish standards for the procedures to insure adequate consideration and rectification of enrollee grievances. A prepaid health plan shall make a finding of fact in the case of each grievance processed, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the enrollee. If the enrollee has an unresolved grievance, the fair hearing provided in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2 shall be available to resolve all grievances regarding care and administration by the prepaid health plan. The findings and recommendations of the department, based on the decision of the hearing officer, shall be binding upon the prepaid health plan. Any changes in a proposed health plan’s grievance procedure must be approved by the department before the changes
 take effect.

(2) (A) Medi-Cal enrollees shall have the same responsibilities and shall be entitled to the same rights as other enrollees with regard to any requirements for arbitration as a condition of membership in a health plan.

(B) Arbitration requirements shall be clearly disclosed in all of the contractor’s Medi-Cal marketing presentations, materials and brochures, enrollment agreements, evidence of coverage, and disclosure forms.

(3) The prepaid health plan shall provide the director, for their approval, a plan for marketing its services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries which relates the proposed service to the need for services, and the size of the potential population to be served in the proposed
 service area.

(4) The prepaid health plan shall demonstrate to the department that it has adequate financial resources, administrative abilities and soundness of program design to carry out its contractual obligations.

(b) The requirements of this section shall apply to all managed care plan contracts entered into under any of the following:

(1) The act that added this subdivision.

(2) Any of the following provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3).

(B) Article 2.9 (commencing
 with Section 14088).

(C) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14490).

(3) Article 7 of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14490).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 4.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14450.5.

(a) No contract between the department and a prepaid health plan that is contracting with, or that is governed, owned, or operated by, a county board of supervisors, shall be approved or renewed unless the standards set forth in Section 1374.16 of the Health and Safety Code are met. The treatment plan developed pursuant to Section 1374.16 of the Health and Safety Code shall be consistent with federal and state medicaid requirements. Nothing in Section 1374.16 of the Health and Safety Code is intended to alter or abrogate any other requirements of federal or state law with regard to medicaid.

(b) The requirements of this section shall apply to all managed care plan contracts entered into under any of the following:

(1) The act that added this subdivision.

(2) Any of the following provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3).

(B) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(C) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(3) Article 7 of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14490).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 31, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14451.

Services under a prepaid health plan contract shall be provided in accordance with the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 39.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14451.5.

(a) A prepaid health plan contractor may not enter into subcontracts when such an action would remove from the contractor his obligation to bear a significant portion of the risk encountered in providing the covered services.

(b) The prepaid health plan may obtain reinsurance for the cost of providing covered services. Such reinsurance shall not limit the contractor’s liability below five thousand dollars ($5,000) per enrollee for any one 12-month period, except that the contractor may also obtain reinsurance for the total cost of services provided to enrollees by noncontractor emergency service providers, and for 90 percent of all costs exceeding 115 percent of its income during any contractor fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.

(a) (1) All subcontracts shall be entered into pursuant to the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 and federal law. All subcontracts shall be in writing, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the department.

(2) Each subcontract shall contain the amount of compensation or other consideration that the subcontractor will receive under the terms of the subcontract with the prepaid health plans. These provisions shall not apply to a provider who is employed or salaried by the prepaid health plan. Unless the department objects, a prepaid health plan may enter into a subcontract in which consideration is determined by a percentage
 of the primary contractor’s payment from the department. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit any subcontract in which consideration is determined on a capitation basis.

(3) Subcontracts between a prepaid health plan and the subcontractor shall be public records on file with the department. The names of the officers and owners of the subcontractor, stockholders owning more than 10 percent of the stock issued by the subcontractor, and major creditors holding more than 5 percent of the debt of the subcontractor shall be submitted by each prepaid health plan to the department and shall be public records on file with the department.

(b) A prepaid health plan that is not a qualified health maintenance organization pursuant to Title XIII of the federal Public
 Health Service Act shall submit all provider and management subcontracts to the department for approval prior to the subcontract taking effect.

(c) Each subcontract shall require that the subcontractor make all of its books and records pertaining to the goods and services furnished under the terms of the subcontract available for inspection, examination, or copying by the department during normal working hours at the subcontractor’s place of business, or another mutually agreeable location in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 5.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.3.

Each prepaid health plan shall provide the services of an optometrist and ophthalmologist when the prepaid health plan contract requires the provision of vision care services.

Vision care services shall be provided so that an enrollee may be seen initially by either a physician or an optometrist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.4.

Where the prepaid health plan agrees to provide dental services such services shall be provided in a manner that does not require the enrollees to receive prior screening or authorization by nondental personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.5.

Each prepaid health plan shall provide the services of a psychologist and psychiatrist when the prepaid health plan contract requires the provision of mental health services. Mental health services shall be provided so that an enrollee may be seen initially by either a physician or a psychologist, or by psychiatric social workers under qualified supervision as otherwise allowed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14452.6.

Prepaid health plans, or their subcontractors, shall not bill any enrollee for covered benefits provided under this chapter and for which capitation has been paid, except as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of this chapter. Health care providers shall not seek reimbursement from enrollees for any services provided under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14453.

In compensating directors and officers, the prepaid health plan shall not compensate at a rate substantially greater than the prevailing charge for similar services in the community. For purposes of this chapter, salaries or other compensation from the prepaid health plan and its subcontractors, excluding reasonable expenses, shall be considered as one.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14454.

(a) The prepaid health plan shall be liable for all in-area and out-of-area emergency services which are required by the contract and rendered by a nonprepaid health plan provider. Payment for such services shall include treatment of emergency conditions and shall continue until such time as the enrollee may be transferred to any provider of the prepaid health plan.

(b) Where a dispute arises between the prepaid health plan and the nonprepaid health plan provider as to the liability of the prepaid health plan for such services, the nonprepaid health plan provider may submit the matter to the director for determination in the form of a claim documenting as fully as reasonably possible the nature of the emergency, the necessity for the treatment rendered, the appropriateness of the length of stay for inpatient care, the reason the patient could not have been transferred to a provider of the prepaid health plan, and including any response by the prepaid health plan to the claim which resulted in the dispute. The director shall, by regulation, provide for resolution of the dispute in a timely fashion and in a manner guaranteeing the procedural due process requirements of the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the department shall use its own hearing officers. The hearing officer may be assisted by a physician. To the extent feasible, the director shall consolidate the claims of the nonprepaid health plan provider against the prepaid health plan.

In no event, shall the prepaid health plan or the nonprepaid health plan provider bill the enrollee for services which are or have been the subject of review by the director pursuant to this section.

(c) If the director determines that the prepaid health plan is liable for the emergency service, the plan shall reimburse the nonprepaid health plan provider within 30 days. If the prepaid health plan fails to reimburse the nonprepaid health plan provider within 30 days, the director shall arrange to set off the amount of the unpaid claim or claims from no fewer than two future capitation payments owed to the prepaid health plan by the department and the department shall forward such setoff or setoffs to the nonprepaid health plan provider. In making such arrangements to set off, the director shall consult with the affected prepaid health plan in an attempt to minimize the impact of such setoff or setoffs on cash flow. When the claim of the nonprepaid health plan provider is satisfied by setoff or setoffs, the director shall satisfy the claim only with the funds of the prepaid health plan and shall in no event use state funds to satisfy such a claim.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude prepaid health plans and nonprepaid health plan providers from entering into voluntary agreements to settle disputed claims for services by means of binding arbitration or by other means acceptable to both parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1121.)
-------------------------------------------

14455.

The prepaid health plan shall maintain a complete unit medical record for each enrollee. Enrollee medical records shall also include records of all treatment received from subcontractors. Such records shall be maintained and preserved in a manner prescribed by the director and shall be available for review by the department and the United States Department of Health, Education, and Welfare.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14456.

The department shall conduct annual medical audits of each prepaid health plan unless the director determines there is good cause for additional reviews.

The reviews shall use the standards and criteria established pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, as appropriate. Except in those instances where major unanticipated administrative obstacles prevent, or after a determination by the director of good cause, the reviews shall be scheduled and carried out jointly with reviews carried out pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, if reviews will be carried out within time periods which satisfy the requirements of federal
 law.

The department shall be authorized to contract with professional organizations or the Department of Managed Health Care, as appropriate, to perform the periodic review required by this section. The department, or its designee, shall make a finding of fact with respect to the ability of the prepaid health plan to provide quality health care services, effectiveness of peer review, and utilization control mechanisms, and the overall performance of the prepaid health plan in providing health care benefits to its enrollees.

The director shall publicly report the findings of finalized annual medical audits conducted pursuant to this section as soon as possible, but no later than 90 days following completion of any corrective action plan initiated pursuant to the audit, if any, unless the director
 determines, in his or her discretion, that additional time is reasonably necessary to fully and fairly report the results of the audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   (SB 964)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14456.3.

(a) The department shall share with the Department of Managed Health Care its findings from medical audits and monthly provider files of a Medi-Cal managed care plan that provides services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or this chapter and is subject to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) To the extent that the department communicates its preliminary investigative audit findings to the Department of Managed Health Care under subdivision (a), those communications shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section
 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 457.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14456.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, Medi-Cal managed care plan means any prepaid health plan or Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or this chapter, or Part 4 (commencing with Section 101525) of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department shall ensure that coverage is provided for medically necessary prescription medications and related medically necessary medical services that are prescribed by a local mental health plan provider, and are within the Medi-Cal scope of benefits, but are excluded from coverage under Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), by doing, at least, all of the following:

(1) Requiring Medi-Cal managed care plans to comply with the following standards:

(A) The decision regarding responsibility and coverage for a prescription drug shall be made by the Medi-Cal managed care plan within 24 hours, or one business day, from the date the request for a decision is received by telephone or other telecommunication device.

(B) The decision regarding responsibility and coverage for services, such as laboratory tests, that are medically necessary because of medications prescribed by a mental health provider, shall be made by the Medi-Cal managed care plan within seven days following the date the request for a decision is received by telephone or other telecommunication device.

(C) If the decision of the Medi-Cal managed care plan on
 the request is a deferral because of a determination that the Medi-Cal managed care plan needs more information, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall transmit notice of the deferral, by facsimile or by other telecommunication system, to the pharmacist or other service provider, to the prescribing mental health provider, and to a designated mental health plan representative. The notice shall set out with specificity what additional information is needed to make a medical necessity determination.

(D) Any denial of authorization or payment for a prescription medication or for any services such as laboratory tests that may be medically necessary because of medications ordered by a mental health plan provider shall set forth the reasons for the denial with specificity. The denial notice shall be transmitted by facsimile or other telecommunication system to the pharmacist or other service provider, to the prescribing mental health provider, to a
 designated mental health plan representative, and by mail to the Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(E) For purposes of subsequent requests for a medication, the local mental health plan provider prescribing the prescription medication shall be treated as a plan provider under subdivision (a) of Section 1367.22 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) If the decision cannot be made within five working days because of a request for additional information, any Medi-Cal managed care plan licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1340) of the Health and Safety Code shall inform the enrollee as required by paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1367.01 of the Health and Safety Code. In regard to any Medi-Cal managed care plan contract as described pursuant to subdivision (a) that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2001, with a plan not licensed pursuant to Division
 2 (commencing with Section 1340) of the Health and Safety Code, if the decision cannot be made within five working days because of a request for additional information as specified in subparagraph (C), the plan shall notify the enrollee, in writing, that the plan cannot make a decision to approve, modify, or deny the request for authorization. All managed care plans shall, upon receipt of all information reasonably necessary for making the decision and that was requested by the plan, approve, modify, or deny the request for authorization within the timeframes specified in subparagraph (A) or (B), whichever applies.

(2) In consultation with the Medi-Cal managed care plans and local mental health plans, establishing a process to recognize credentialing of local mental health plan providers, for the purpose of expediting approval of medications prescribed by a local mental health plan provider who is not contracting with the Medi-Cal managed care
 plan. In implementing this requirement, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not be required to violate licensure, accreditation, or certification requirements of other entities.

(3) Requiring any Medi-Cal managed care plan to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local mental health plan. The memorandum of understanding shall comply with applicable regulations.

(c) The department may sanction a Medi-Cal managed care plan for violations of this section pursuant to Section 14088.23 or 14197.7.

(d) Every Medi-Cal managed care plan that provides prescription drug benefits and that maintains one or more drug
 formularies shall provide to members of the public, upon request, a copy of the most current list of prescription drugs on the formulary of the Medi-Cal managed care plan, by therapeutic category, with an indication of whether any drugs on the list are preferred over other listed drugs. If the Medi-Cal managed care plan maintains more than one formulary, the plan shall notify the requester that a choice of formulary lists is available.

(e) This section shall apply to any contracts entered into, amended, modified, or extended on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 10.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14457.

(a) In addition to the reviews required or authorized by Section 14456, the department shall conduct periodic onsite visits or additional visits after a determination by the director of good cause by departmental representatives to include observation of the general operation of the prepaid health plan, the condition of the facilities for delivering health care, the availability of emergency services, the degree of satisfaction of the enrollees, the operation of the plan’s grievance system, and the administrative and financial aspects of the operation of the prepaid health plan.

(b) Except when reviewing a plan’s grievance system or marketing
 activities, this evaluation shall use standards and criteria established pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975. Except in those instances where major, unanticipated administrative obstacles prevent, or after a determination by the director of good cause, the visits shall be scheduled and carried out jointly with reviews carried out pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, if reviews under that act will be carried out within time periods that satisfy the requirements of federal law.

(c) The State Department of Health Services may contract with the Department of Managed Health Care to perform the periodic visits required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 6.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14458.

The prepaid health plan shall establish procedures for continuously reviewing the quality of care, performance of medical personnel, the utilization of services and facilities, and costs. Information derived from such review shall be made available to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14459.
